Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.117.050

Internet website and outreach program.

(1) To the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose, the office shall develop and maintain an internet website and outreach program to serve as a comprehensive portal for foster care youth and unaccompanied youth or young adults who have experienced homelessness in Washington state to obtain information regarding higher education and registered apprenticeship and recognized preapprenticeship programs. In developing the website and conducting the outreach program, the office shall get input from community and technical colleges; the foster care partnership; institutions of higher education; the employment security department; the state apprenticeship and training council; the workforce training and education coordinating board; department of commerce office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs; department of children, youth, and families; the department of licensing; and the department of labor and industries. The outreach program and website shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) Academic, social, family, financial, and logistical information important to successful postsecondary educational success;

(b) How and when to obtain and complete college applications;

(c) How and when to apply for a registered apprenticeship or preapprenticeship program;

(d) What academic subject matter prerequisites, if any, are generally required for acceptance to an institute of higher education, a registered apprenticeship, or a preapprenticeship program;

(e) What college placement tests, if any, are generally required for admission to college and when and how to register for such tests;

(f) How and when to obtain and complete a federal free application for federal student aid (FAFSA) or if ineligible to apply for the FAFSA, the state financial aid application approved by the office; and

(g) Detailed sources of financial aid and assistance likely available to eligible former foster care and unaccompanied homeless youth, including the financial aid and assistance provided by this chapter.

(2) The office shall determine whether to design, build, and operate such program and website directly or to use, support, and modify existing websites created by government or nongovernmental entities for a similar purpose.

[ 2018 c 232 s 7; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 223; 2007 c 314 s 6.]

NOTES:

Short title—2018 c 232: See note following RCW 28B.117.010.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Expiration date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 220-225: See note following RCW 28B.117.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.